android/device/softwinner/wing-common/apkdata/txt2epub/hyphenDicts/hyph_en.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 3
% ADOBE CONFIDENTIAL
% ___________________
%
%  Copyright ©2010 Adobe Systems Incorporated
%  All Rights Reserved.
%
% NOTICE:  All information contained herein is, and remains
% the property of Adobe Systems Incorporated and its suppliers,
% if any.  The intellectual and technical concepts contained
% herein are proprietary to Adobe Systems Incorporated and its
% suppliers and are protected by trade secret or copyright law.
% Dissemination of this information or reproduction of this material
% is strictly forbidden unless prior written permission is obtained
% from Adobe Systems Incorporated.
%
% Version 1.0.1 August 23 2010
%
.a2
.ab1al
.ab1it
.ac3eta
.ac1ey
.a4ch
.ach2e
.ac2h2m
.ac1on
.ac3ron
.acr2
.a1cy4
.ad2d3ed
.ad1d2
.ad2d3er
.ad2d3in
.adis1
.ael1
.ae1r2i
.ae2t
.a2f1f
.af1t
.ag1at
.ag3e2rs
.ag2i
.agil3el
.agi3l3en
.ag3r2o.
.ail1a
.air1i
.al1c
.ald2
.al1di
.al3do
.al3is4h
.al1ix1
.all3e2r.
.al1th
.al1ti
.am1ar
.am1at
.am1et
.am3ida
.am1ie
.am1it
.am1o3ro
.am1pe
.a4na
.an1ad
.an1ak2
.an1c
.an1de
.an1et
.an1ge
.angel3ic
.an1gel
.ange3l3in
.angel3os
.an1gi
.an1il
.an1im
.an1kl
.a2nk
.an1ne2t3
.an3o2n.
.ano2n1
.an1op
.an1or
.an1se
.a2ns
.an2tal2
.a2nt
.an1ta
.an3t2e.
.an3t2ed
.an3ter
.an3tes
.an2thi
.an1th
.an3ti
.ant1l
.ap1at
.ap3ert
.aph1o1
.aphro1di3s
.aph1ro
.a4po
.apprais3a
.a2p1p
.approv3a
.ap3rop
.aq3uil
.ar3a3bl
.ar1aw2
.arch4e
.ar3cher4
.arch3es
.ar1d
.ar3e4a.
.ar1gi
.ar2i2a.
.ar1ie
.ari3es
.ar1l
.ar3mis2
.aro4d
.aro1d3it
.a2r1s2
.ar1th
.arthrit3i3d
.art3in
.ar1ty
.as2ket
.as1p
.as1s
.as4se2s.
.ass1es
.as1ta
.as1te
.a2tom1
.a1to
.2a4tu
.au1be2
.au1d
.au1ge
.aun3ty
.au2nt
.author3e
.1au1th
.av1al
.av1ar
.ave1l
.aveng3er
.aveng3es
.av3e2r.
.av3i2d.
.aw3ne
.aw1ni
.ax3l2e.
.ax2le
.ax1
.b2
.ball3in2
.bang3e2r.
.ba1n3ip
.bar3it
.bell3in2
.be1q
.be1r2a
.be3ret4
.1bere
.bi1a
.bi2a2s.
.bi2er
.1bie
.bi3h
.bi1na
.bin2d
.bi1on
.bit3er
.bit3et
.bi1va
.1biv
.blem1
.bles2s3e
.bles2
.b1l2ess
.bro3ki
.br2
.but4t3ed
.but1te
.butt2
.but2t3i
.c2
.ca3fes
.1ca
.ca2f
.camp3er
.ca3n2a.
.can1c
.can3ter
.ca2nt
.capa3b
.ca1pa
.ca3per
.cap1l
.car3at
.car3ie
.car3ol
.car2pu
.car3ter
.ca1ru
.cas1s
.ca2t1i
.cel1a
.ce2n1s2
.cephal3i
.1cep
.cephal2
.ce1v
.ch2
.chan2c3i
.chap3el
.charg3es
.1charg
.chem3ist
.chew3et
.chill3in2
.chil2l
.ci1d
.cin1d
.cine1
.ci3n1er2
.1cis1
.ci2t3ie
.cit1r2
.c1i2ty1
.col1i
.con1d
.co3rel
.cor3ner
.count3e2r.
.cou2nt
.count3er2s.
.counte2rs
.crani3al
.cr2
.cra1nia
.cra3ter
.craw3lie
.cuf2
.cul3ler
.cu2re
.cu3ret
.cut3er
.cut3est
.cyclo3pa
.1cy
.cy1c
.cy1cl
.d2
.dae2m
.1dae
.dan3te
.da2nt
.deaco3n2a
.dea1co2
.deav1
.dec3o1ro
.1dec
.decor2
.de3led
.demea3nou
.de1mea
.dem3oi3
.de1r2a
.de3ris2
.dern1
.1des2c
.de3sce
.de3ste
.dev3i2l
.1dev
.dia3r4i
.di1ar
.di3a3ry
.di1de
.1did
.dioc3esa2n.
.di1o1ce
.dio4ce1sa
.di3v2es
.1div
.dmi1
.2d1m
.dog1g
.1dog
.do2le
.do2v
.2d1u2ca
.du1ra
.1dur
.du1r2e
.dwin1
.d1wi
.dys3
.e2
.ea1g
.eal1
.eas1i
.eas3te2r.
.ea4t
.eat1e
.eat3o2n.
.ea1to
.eb2b
.ebb1i
.echo3i
.ec1u
.ed1er
.ed3ite
.ed3i2t1in
.educat3ed1
.e2d1u1ca
.educat2e
.ee1
.ee3n
.eer2
.eg2g
.eg1g1i
.eg1l
.ei1t
.ek1in
.elam1
.el1d2
.el1em
.el2f1
.elic3
.el1ig
.eli2t
.ell3in2g.
.ellin2
.el4op
.elz1
.e2m3b2
.em1ig
.em1in2
.en1ab
.enam1
.enceph3
.en1cep
.encepha3
.en1ch
.en3det
.e1n1es
.en1g
.e2n1s2
.ens3e2n.
.e2n1t
.eo2c
.eos1
.eq3u2it
.er1og
.er2r1i
.e2r1r
.es1
.ess3e2n.
.2ess
.es1sen
.eta1g
.e4th
.eth3a2n2e.
.eu1
.eur2i
.eu2tr2
.e4ve
.ev1er
.eys3
.f2
.favour3a
.1fa
.fa1v
.fe1r2a
.fix2es
.1fix1
.fla4t
.flat3use
.fl2atu
.fla3tus
.flu3oro
.fo1et
.1fo
.form4e
.f2orm
.for3mer
.found3e2r.
.found3e2rs
.g2
.ga1bl
.ga2my
.gel3a
.gel3li
.ge2nt2
.gen3tl
.ge3ran
.gesell3
.ges2e
.ge1sel
.1gi1a
.gi2b
.gi2m
.gi1na
.giv3er
.1giv
.giv3et
.god1l
.1god
.go1me
.gor3ie
.go2ry
.g4ra
.guel1
.gui2n3e
.h2
.ha3bil
.ha3bitan
.hab3i1ta
.ha3des
.ha3ler
.ham1i
.hand3er
.hand3i
.hanu3ka
.ha1nu
.ha1ra
.har3py
.has3ten
.h2as
.haugh3
.ha3ve2n.
.hav3et
.heat3e
.hea2t
.he2c
.he2i
.hein3er
.he2in2e
.he3lam
.he3lan
.hel3e2n.
.helen2
.hes3te2r.
.het1
.he2w
.hew3et
.hi1la
.hi3ram
.ho3lie
.ho3lis
.hones3ti
.hon3est
.hon3ey
.hon1i
.honour3a
.hon1our
.hoo3si
.hor3it
.horn3i
.hos3es
.hos2e
.hospita3b
.hos1pi
.hospi1ta
.hov1
.huma3nise
.hu1ma
.hup1ham3
.hur3tl
.hy2s1
.i2
.ia2n2
.i1b1r2
.ic1ie2
.id2l
.if3
.ig1
.ik1e
.ila1
.il1li
.im1
.imag3es
.i2m2ag
.im3age
.i2m3b
.imita3b
.i2m1it
.imi1ta
.i2m3m2
.in1
.in3es
.inev1
.in2i
.in2ky
.i2nk
.intes3
.i2nt
.io1d
.ire3n4i
.i4ri
.i2r3r
.ish1i2h
.is2i
.it2i
.i1t3iv
.i2t1s
.itu1
.iu1
.ja1ka
.1j
.ju2r2y.
.ju1ry
.k2
.ka1g
.ka1t1r2
.ka1w
.ken2d3a
.kes1t
.kind3e2r.
.1kind
.kind3li1e
.ko1s
.kr2
.l2
.la1bi
.lac1i2
.laci3e2
.la2cy
.la1ge
.lai2
.la1it
.la3mar
.la4me
.la2n2i.
.la1ra
.lat3er
.lat3i2n.
.lat1in
.la3vel
.la3ve2r.
.lazi3er
.la1zie
.leagu3er
.le3an2n.
.learn3e
.leav3er
.leav3et
.leb1e
.led3ger
.le4g3ate
.le1ga
.le2gr
.lehe3mi
.le1h
.lem1a
.le2m1o
.lend3e
.le2p1r
.l2e1sh
.3lest3e
.le4v3el
.le3ver
.le1we
.li1a1b
.li1ar
.lick4e
.li2ck
.lift3e2rs
.lifte2
.lighten3et
.light3e
.light1en
.lik1i
.1lik
.li2l2y
.lim3ber
.li2mb
.li2m1i4t
.lim1i
.limit3e
.li2na
.lin3ger
.ling2f
.li1no
.lin3ti
.li2nt
.li1o
.lis2ti
.li2t
.li3te2r.
.li3v1ia
.liv1i
.liz1
.loi1t
.long3et
.lo1tr2
.lous3ed
.lov3er
.low1l
.ly1a
.m2
.ma3cad1a2m.
.ma2ca
.malay3an
.ma1lay
.ma1li3a
.manag3e2r.
.man1age
.ma2n1t
.ma3nue
.ma2ny
.1ma3r4i.
.ma3r4i2a.
.mar3i1n1er
.marin2e
.mart2
.mar3te
.mar3ti
.ma3thi
.1m4at3in
.mat1z
.1maz1d
.mc1
.med3i2c.
.me2nes
.2me1ne
.m2er3c
.mercu3ry
.mer3cu
.mer3o2n.
.mi2n3ab
.mi1na
.mi2n2i.
.min3i2s.
.mi3r2i.
.mi3s4e2r.
.mis1er
.mi3ter
.mi1tr2
.mobi3lis
.1mob
.mo1bi
.1mod1
.mol2d3e
.mon2a3l2
.1mon
.m4ona
.mo2n3ie
.3moni
.mo3nis
.mo2n2o.
.mono3l2
.mon3tes
.mo2nt
.mor3at
.mo3res
.mo1ro
.mortgag3es
.mort1g
.mort3ga
.mos4es
.mo3se2s.
.mo1ti
.mous3i
.mov3et
.n2
.na2be
.nag1e
.na1ke
.nak2
.2na3re
.na2to
.na3tom
.naz1a
.neg3a1to
.ne3i1da
.neis1
.ne2ma4
.ne1m1i
.1n2ess1
.nev3i2l
.ng1
.ni1ag
.n4on1
.nos3es
.nos2e
.noth1
.no1ti
.nu2ff1
.nug1
.o2
.ob1al
.o1bi2
.o2c1t
.oc1u
.od2d3
.odd1e
.od2ed
.od1in
.odo2m1
.od1on
.oe2s
.of1te2
.oi2
.ok2
.old3er
.old1i
.ol1iv
.ol3m
.o2l1s
.om1el
.om1er
.om1in
.om1p
.on2ce
.on1c
.on1d
.o4ne
.on1i
.o2n1k
.on1o
.oo1d
.oo1li
.ooz3i3e
.ope2
.oph1r
.or4al
.or3a1to
.or1c
.or1d
.or3e1go
.ori1f
.or3ifi
.ori1z
.orman3
.2orm
.or1ma
.or1ne
.or1t
.2os1c
.os1he
.os1k
.os1o
.os1p
.os1te
.os4tl
.os1to
.o1s1u
.ote1
.ot1t2
.ough2
.oust3e
.out1
.ov4a
.ow2e
.oys1
.p2
.pac3ies
.pacie2
.pan1d
.par3abl
.para3b
.pec1to3
.pe2ct
.ped3al
.2ped
.3peda
.pe3las
.1pela
.peo3pl2e.
.1peo
.permea3bi
.per1m
.perme1ab
.pes1k
.pet3al
.ph2
.phas3es
.phas2e
.ph2as
.phi3los
.phon4
.pho3n1ic
.pi1a
.pi2e2r.
.pier2
.pif3
.1pip4e
.pi3pe2rs
.pip3er
.pi3sce
.pis1c
.pi2t
.pi1t3ie
.po1g
.pon3der
.pool2e
.po2ra
.1po1ro
.1por3ta
.por2t4a3b
.port4e
.por3ter
.possi3
.pos1s2
.post3e2r.
.post3e2rs
.pout3e
.2pout
.pov3
.practic3es
.pra2ct
.prac1ti
.pray2e
.3pre2d3a1to
.p2red
.pre1dat
.pre4s3en2t.
.pres2e
.pre1se2nt
.pro4d3uc2ts
.pro1du
.pro1du2ct
.prom3ise
.prom3is1i
.pu2r2r
.purr3i
.pur1t
.1pu3tin
.put4t3ed
.put1te
.putt2
.r2
.ra3ch1e2l.
.rach4e
.rach1el
.rac3ie2
.ra3ci2n2e.
.r2acin
.ra2c3is
.ra2cy
.raf3ter
.rafte2
.rag1g
.ra3gou
.ra3mie
.rang3er
.ran2ge
.ra1ni
.ra2p3is
.rar1a
.2ra1si
.ras1t
.rat3er
.ra1tio3
.ra3ve2n.
.rav3e1ne
.rav3eni
.rav3en3o
.rav3er
.re3a2d1m
.re1an
.re3dic
.2red
.re1du
.re3ech
.re1em
.re1en
.reengag3es
.reen1ga
.re3fer1a
.re2i2n.
.re1in
.rel3i2ct
.re1li
.re3men
.re3mis
.re1na
.ren1c
.ren2t3a
.re2nt
.ren2t3o
.re1pi
.repres3s3i4b
.re1pr2ess
.re1r2
.re3sen
.res2e
.res3er1va
.res2erv
.resis2t3e
.re1sis
.re3s3tat
.r4es4ta
.rest3on
.r4esto
.re1te
.re1th
.re3tie
.re1us2
.re1ut
.re1w
.rhe4a
.ri2a2n
.ri2c
.rig3i2d1n
.ril1i
.rin2d
.ring3er
.ring3l
.ri1so
.rit1u
.ri1va
.ro3den
.ro3der
.ro1di
.r2o1ga
.ro2gan
.ro2k
.roll3er
.romanc3er
.ro1ma
.ro2p
.rop1i
.ro2q2
.ros3es
.ros3i3er
.ros1t
.rou3se2rs
.row1a
.row1d
.rug1g
.ru1r
.rust2e
.rust3in
.ry1o
.s2
.sa1b2l
.2sab
.sa1hi
.sa3lin
.sa3lis
.sa3r4i.
.sa1tia4
.1sat
.1s2ci1e2
.sclero3s
.s1cl
.scle1ro
.se2a2n.
.se1an
.seg1u
.sei3gn
.1sei
.se3lee
.sel2l3
.se3n1in
.sep1h
.se3r2ie
.ses1t
.s1es
.sev3era
.sev3e2red
.sev3er1in
.sew1i
.sh2
.sha3lo
.shi3er
.sh1in3g2
.shov3er
.sid2e
.sin3g2l
.2sing
.si3nit
.sis3t
.1sis
.s4it
.slan3d
.so3les
.so4lu
.sol3ute
.so1lut
.soph3i2s4t.
.soph3is2ts
.sos1
.s4pe
.spe2c3t
.spou3s4a
.st2
.sta3ble
.sta3bly
.start3e
.ste3r2o
.s4t4i
.sto3ver
.strat3er
.str2
.stra3t3us
.str2atu
.stroph3i
.stud3ies
.1stud
.su3r2a.
.1su
.sur3al
.swa1hi3
.sw2
.t2
.ta3bl2e.
.ta3bli
.ta1ha
.ta3ler
.tall3e
.tam3per
.ta3n2i2s.
.tank3e
.ta2nk
.t4ap
.tardi3
.tee1p
.te1ic
.te2le
.te3le4ph3o1ny
.tele1p
.tena3ble
.te4n1ab
.ten3an
.ten3de2rs
.1tend
.ten3det
.termi3na
.ter1m
.term2in
.termi2n2a3b
.tes3ta
.th2
.thar2
.tho2m
.ti2e2r.
.til1i
.til2l4
.til3ler
.tin3g2l
.3t2i1n2i1
.ti2n1k
.tis1s
.ti2ti
.to3led
.to3mat
.ton3ie
.top3ic
.1topi
.to3r1er2
.tou3ch2e.
.to3war
.trac3ta
.tr2
.tra2ct
.tracta3b
.trea3tie
.trea2t
.trek3ker
.tri1d
.tri3p4lin
.trip1l2i
.tr2ipl
.tro3ph
.trop3ic
.tui3ti
.3tu1i2
.tu1te
.1tut
.u2
.ug1l
.ul1
.ul3i
.un1
.un3d2
.u1n3ess
.un2i1f
.u2nt4
.up1
.upa1
.ur1c
.ure1
.urol3o1gie
.ur1si
.u2rs
.us1a
.us1er
.us1i
.u4s1t
.vagi1
.van2n
.va1p
.var3ies
.2ve1da
.v4el
.4ve1le
.ve1lo
.vend3er
.ve3nou
.ven3ue
.ve1ra
.vi1a1b
.vid3eo
.vi2e
.vin3ci3
.vi3s2a.
.vi3ti
.vi3v1i4a
.1viv
.w2
.wat2te
.wa2tt2
.week3l
.weld3e
.well3i
.wel2l
.weth1
.wild3e2r.
.w2ild
.wi2l2y
.wi2n
.worthi3l
.wor1thi
.wo3ven
.x2
.xe1
.x1e2r1x2
.y2
.y1er1
.zach1
.ze1ng
.zing3er
2a.
aa1b
aa1ch
aa1dah
aa1di
aa1fe
aa1ga
aalan1
aa1man
aa1ma1t
aa1mit
aan1i
aar1at
aa1rin
aar1l
aaron1
aar3o2n.
aar3on3it
aaron2i
aa1ta
aa1za
aa1zie
ab1aci
a1bae
a1bah
aba1l2i
abal3li
a1bap
ab1ar1d
ab1are
abas1t
ab3atis
ab1a2tt2
a1bay
a2b2e.
abe1c
abe2l
abel3li
ab1era
ab1erc
ab1erd
ab1er1f
ab1erg
ab1er1h
ab1ern
ab1e2r1r
ab1ery
abe3tha
abi1a2n
abi2at
2abib
ab1ic
ab3i1d2a.
ab1i1f
abil4is
abi3list
ab1in1m2
ab1i2ns
a1bis1c
4ab1la
ab1lea
ab3le2t.
ab3le2ts
ab1lis
ab1lu
ab1oc
ab1o1la
3a1b4o4l3ic
abon1e
a1bo2r.
ab1ota
2abr2
ab1rac
ab1rim
ab1rog
ab1ti
ab1ul
ab2ut
ab1wi
ab1yl
ab1yr
a3ca1b
a1ca
a3cad1a2ms
a2c1ah
a2car
ac1a2r.
ac1arc
ac1ard
ac1are
ac1ari
ac1aro
acar3th
aca3ter
a3cau
1a1ce2ls
ac1emo
ace1m
ac1e2r.
ac1era
ac1erd
ac1eri
ac1ern
ac1ero
ac1e2rs
ac1ert
ac1er1v
ac1ery
ac1e2t.
ac1ete
acet2i
ace3tic
ac1e1to
ac1e2ts
ac1ett2
1achac
acha3ry
achath3it
a1chat
ac1haz
a1chea
ach1el
a1chem
ach3e2n.
ache2n
ach3ery
achet3es
ach3eth1
a1chev
a3chine
a1chir
a2c2h1n
a1cho
ach1ra
ach1ri
ach3romati
achro1ma
ac2h2s
a1chu
acial2l
a1cia
aci1b2
ac1ic
ac1idl
ac3i3ficati
acifi1ca
ac3i1fie
ac1i1fy
ac1ile
a1cili
ac3illa3ry
acil1la
ac1i1l2y
a1ci2n.
ac1i1na
aci3nes
2a1cio
2ac1it
aci1tr2
acker3el
a2ck
ack1er
ack2i1ne
ack1i
ack1os
acla1
a1cl
acnaugh3
ac1na
ac1oly
a1com
ac1on1c
ac2on3e
a2c3o3nis
acoph1
a1co1s2e
a1cow
ac1ra3m
acr2
ac1rim
ac1ris
ac1rob
ac1ro1m
ac1rop4
ac3ta3bi
a2ct
ac3ta3bly
ac1tan
ac1ter
ac1ua
a1c2ud
a2cue
acui3
ac1ul
acular2
acu1la
a1c2u2l1t
a1cur
3acus2e.
a1c2us
a1cuz1
acyc3lic
a1cy
acy1c
acy1cl
ad1ab
a1d1ac
ad1a1ga
ad1age
ad1a2m.
ad1ama
1adami
ad1a2ms
ad1ani
1adap
a1dau
a1daw
ad2det
ad1d2
ad1ean
a1dee
1a1deme
3a1dem3ic
ade1mo
ademoi3
ad1e1my
ad1e2n.
ad1en1l
ad1enn
1adep
ad1er
ad2eri
a1d4er1m
ad2e1ro
ad1eth
ad1ha
1a1dib
ad1i1ca
adi3e2r.
1a1dig
ad1i1j
ad1i2ms
ad4ine
ad1ing
a1dio
adi3o4g1ra1phy
adi4olo
adi1ol
ad1ip
1a1disa
1a1dise
a1d4isi
adi2s3ia2c.
adi1sia
adisi1ac
a1dist
2a1di1u
a4div
ad2ling
ad1mind2
a2d1m
1admit
ad3ne
a2d1n
a2d1oa
ad1ole
ad1oli
a1dom
ado1ni
1adop
adopt3e
ado2pt
ador3a2n.
ad1ot
ad1ow
ad1q
ad3ran
ad1rap
ad1ric
a1drid
ad1rig
ad1rip
ad1ron
ad1r2y.
ad1si
a2ds
ad1st
ad2su
ad1u1a
a1duc
ad1u1la
ad1um
ad1u1t
ad1w
ae1b
ae3c2e.
ae1ci
ae1co
aecol3o1gie
ae1cu
ae1ga
ae1gid
ae1gl
ae1gy
ae1i
ael1an
ael1en2
aeli2
ae1lis
a1el1it
ael1o
ae2ls2
ael1se
ael1ss
ae1l1u
ae1ma
ae1men
ae1nae
ae1ne
ae1ol
ae3ol3o1gie
aep1
aepa1
aer1e1
ae1ria
aero1
ae2r1om1
ae1sch2
ae1s3e
ae1si
a1e1th
ae1tor
ae1tr2
a2eu
ae3ve
ae1vi
a2f1ad
a1fa
a2f1ag
afam1
af1est
af1e1te1
aff3i1er
a2ff
af2fie
aff3ing
af1fit
a1f2i.
a3fi2a
af1in
af1is
af1le
af1l2i
af1ly1
